Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Chapter 10.1. Utility Facilities Act.
§ 56-265.3:1.
Certificates to furnish water and sewer service.

Any company proposing to construct facilities after January 1, 1995, ultimately intended to make water or sewer service available to more than fifty residential building lots shall, prior to construction or financial commitments therefor, organize a public
service corporation and seek certificates of public convenience and necessity pursuant to §§ 56-265.2 and 56-265.3. The application for such certificates shall include (i) a comprehensive business plan detailing the technical,
managerial and financial resources to be devoted to operation of the water or sewer service; (ii) except in the case of a company seeking a certificate to operate a sewer service only, proof of receipt of, or application for, a
permit for the facilities pursuant to Virginia Department of Health requirements under Article 2 (§

32.1-167

et seq.) of Chapter 6 of Title 32.1; and (iii) such other information as is now or hereafter deemed appropriate by the Commission, including proof of the issuance of a bond or the deposit of funds in escrow as may
be required by the Department of Health pursuant to §

32.1-174.1

.

Certificates of public convenience and necessity shall not be granted by the Commission unless, in addition to the findings required by §§ 56-265.2 and 56-265.3, it also finds that the comprehensive business plan presented in the application reasonably
assures that system performance requirements for providing water supply can be met over the long term and at reasonable costs. The Commission may issue such certification with any conditions or restrictions as public interest may
require.

Water or sewer companies existing on or before January 1, 1995 which extend their service at any time following the effective date of this section shall not be required to comply with the requirements thereof.

If any applicant under this section so requests, the Commission shall not disclose the contents of the comprehensive business plan except as necessary to perform its duties.

History.
1994, c. 852.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
6B M.J. Drains, Sewers and Drainage Districts, § 4; 20 M.J. Water Companies and Waterworks, § 2.

§ 56-265.4.
Certificate to operate in territory of another certificate holder.

Except as provided in § 56-265.4:4, no certificate shall be granted to an applicant proposing to operate in the territory of any holder of a certificate unless and until it shall be proved to the satisfaction of the Commission that the service rendered
by such certificate holder in such territory is inadequate to the requirements of the public necessity and convenience; and if the Commission shall be of opinion that the service rendered by such certificate holder in such territory
is in any respect inadequate to the requirements of the public necessity and convenience, such certificate holder shall be given reasonable time and opportunity to remedy such inadequacy before any certificate shall be granted to an
applicant proposing to operate in such territory. For the purposes of this section, the transportation of natural gas by pipeline, without providing service to end users within the territory, shall not be considered operating in the
territory of another certificate holder.

History.
1950, p. 600; 1984, c. 382; 2014, cc. 467, 507.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 467 and 507 are identical, and added the last sentence.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Whether electric utility customer located in the service territory of one electric utility may obtain service from another utility

through a metering point in an adjacent service territory is a determination for the State Corporation Commission. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Terry G. Kilgore, Member, House of Delegates, 05-064, (12/15/05).

§ 56-265.4:1.
Furnishing of electric public utility service or provision of facilities therefor by municipal corporations and other governmental bodies.

If any municipal corporation or other governmental body, having legal authority by charter or other law, shall desire to supply electric public utility service, or construct, enlarge or acquire, by lease or otherwise, any electric utility facilities,
outside its political boundaries, it shall have power to enter into agreements in that regard with affected public utilities which shall be binding in accordance with their terms and for the period therein provided; but no contract
entered into under this section shall limit the power of the Commission to fix rates and to otherwise regulate a public utility. No such service by a municipal corporation or other governmental body shall be provided, or facilities
constructed, enlarged or acquired, in territory allotted to any public utility by the Commission except in territory served by such municipal corporation or other governmental body on June 26, 1964, unless the affected public utility
shall consent by such an agreement or the Commission shall grant a certificate therefor upon application by the municipal corporation or other governmental body pursuant to § 56-265.4, authority for which certification is hereby granted.
Provided, however, this limitation on the extension of public utility service by any municipal corporation or governmental body outside its political boundaries shall not be applicable to cities or towns extending their service in
accordance with the provisions of § 56-265.4:2. No public utility shall extend its electric public utility service, or construct, enlarge or acquire, by lease or otherwise, any electric utility facilities, in territory served exclusively
by a municipal corporation or other governmental body on June 26, 1964, unless such municipal corporation or other governmental body shall consent by such an agreement. In case of question as to the scope of the territory served by
a municipal corporation or other governmental body on June 26, 1964, the Commission may, and on application by either such public utility or such municipal corporation or other governmental body shall, decide such question and allot
such territory accordingly, between such public utility and such municipal corporation or other governmental body, in which event any expansion of service outside the territory so allotted shall be subject to the applicable provisions
of this chapter, provided, however, that nothing contained herein shall prevent any municipal corporation from constructing or maintaining facilities in county areas for the purpose of generating or purchasing electricity to be transmitted
into the service area of such municipal corporation.

History.
1964, c. 228; 1978, c. 325.

§ 56-265.4:2.
Extension of service by cities and towns into annexed areas.

Any city or town in the Commonwealth which provides electric utility service for the use of its residents may, at any time following annexation of additional territory to such city or town, acquire the distribution system facilities of the electric utility
serving the annexed area in the manner provided by Title 25.1. As used in this section (i) the term “distribution system facilities” shall be deemed to include all facilities necessary to distribute electric utility service to
any annexed area but shall not include substations of the public utility whose facilities are being acquired, and (ii) the terms “city” and “town” shall not include a shire, a borough or any other subdivision of a city or town.
This section shall not apply to the addition of territory to a city or town by consolidation, merger, or through any other procedure that results in an effective combination with another governmental entity.

Upon completion of the eminent domain proceedings or upon the negotiation of a settlement between the city or town and the electric utility, the State Corporation Commission shall amend the certificate of convenience and necessity of the public utility
whose distribution system facilities have been acquired to reflect the change in its territory.

History.
1978, c. 325; 1987, c. 337; 1995, c. 36.

The 1995 amendment,
in the second sentence of subsection A, inserted “(i)” following “this section” and inserted the language beginning “and (ii) the terms . . .”; and added the third sentence.

§ 56-265.4:3.
Repealed by Acts 2011, cc. 738 and 740, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 56-265.4:3, pertaining to mobile telephone service or radio paging service in certificated territory of another company, was derived from Acts 1980, c. 294; 1984, c. 449.

§ 56-265.4:4.
Certificate to operate as a telephone utility.

The Commission may grant certificates to competing telephone companies, or any county, city or town that operates an electric distribution system, for interexchange service where it finds that such action is justified by public interest, and is in accordance
with such terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions as may be prescribed by the Commission for competitive telecommunications services. A certificate to provide interexchange services shall not authorize the holder to provide
local exchange services. The Commission may grant a certificate to a carrier, or any county, city or town that operates an electric distribution system, to furnish local exchange services as provided in subsection B.

After notice to all local exchange carriers certificated in the Commonwealth and other interested parties and following an opportunity for hearing, the Commission may grant certificates to any telephone company, or any county, city or town that operates
an electric distribution system, proposing to furnish local exchange telephone service in the Commonwealth. In determining whether to grant a certificate under this subsection, the Commission may require that the applicant
show that it possesses sufficient technical, financial, and managerial resources. Before granting any such certificate, the Commission shall: (i) consider whether such action reasonably protects the affordability of basic
local exchange telephone service, as such service is defined by the Commission, and reasonably assures the continuation of quality local exchange telephone service; and (ii) find that such action will not unreasonably prejudice
or disadvantage any class of telephone company customers or telephone service providers, including the new entrant and any incumbent local exchange telephone company, and is in the public interest. Except as provided in
subsection A of §

15.2-2160

, all local exchange certificates granted by the Commission after July 1, 2002, shall be to provide service in any territory in the Commonwealth unless the applicant specifically requests a different certificated
service territory. The Commission shall amend the certificated service territory of each local exchange carrier that was previously certificated to provide service in only part of the Commonwealth to permit such carrier’s
provision of local exchange service throughout the Commonwealth beginning on September 1, 2002, unless that local exchange carrier notifies the Commission prior to September 1, 2002, that it elects to retain its existing
certificated service territory. A local exchange carrier shall only be considered an incumbent in any certificated service territory in which it was considered an incumbent prior to July 1, 2002, except that the Commission
may make changes to a local exchange carrier’s incumbent certificated service territory at the request of those incumbent local exchange carriers that are directly involved in a proposed change in the certificated service
territory. B. 1. After notice to all local exchange carriers certificated in the Commonwealth and other interested parties and following an opportunity for hearing, the Commission may grant certificates to any telephone
company, or any county, city or town that operates an electric distribution system, proposing to furnish local exchange telephone service in the Commonwealth. In determining whether to grant a certificate under this subsection,
the Commission may require that the applicant show that it possesses sufficient technical, financial, and managerial resources. Before granting any such certificate, the Commission shall: (i) consider whether such action
reasonably protects the affordability of basic local exchange telephone service, as such service is defined by the Commission, and reasonably assures the continuation of quality local exchange telephone service; and (ii)
find that such action will not unreasonably prejudice or disadvantage any class of telephone company customers or telephone service providers, including the new entrant and any incumbent local exchange telephone company,
and is in the public interest. Except as provided in subsection A of §

15.2-2160

, all local exchange certificates granted by the Commission after July 1, 2002, shall be to provide service in any territory in the Commonwealth unless the applicant specifically requests a different certificated
service territory. The Commission shall amend the certificated service territory of each local exchange carrier that was previously certificated to provide service in only part of the Commonwealth to permit such carrier’s
provision of local exchange service throughout the Commonwealth beginning on September 1, 2002, unless that local exchange carrier notifies the Commission prior to September 1, 2002, that it elects to retain its existing
certificated service territory. A local exchange carrier shall only be considered an incumbent in any certificated service territory in which it was considered an incumbent prior to July 1, 2002, except that the Commission
may make changes to a local exchange carrier’s incumbent certificated service territory at the request of those incumbent local exchange carriers that are directly involved in a proposed change in the certificated service
territory.

A Commission order, including appropriate findings of fact and conclusions of law, denying or approving, with or without modification, an application for certification of a new entrant shall be entered no more than 180 days from the filing of the application,
except that the Commission, upon notice to all parties in interest, may extend that period in additional 30-day increments not to exceed an additional 90 days in all.

The Commission shall (i) promote and seek to assure the provision of competitive services to all classes of customers throughout all geographic areas of the Commonwealth by a variety of service providers; (ii) require equity in the treatment of the certificated
local exchange telephone companies so as to encourage competition based on service, quality, and price differences between alternative providers; (iii) consider the impact on competition of any government-imposed restrictions
limiting the markets to be served or the services offered by any provider; (iv) determine the form of rate regulation, if any, for the local exchange services to be provided by the applicant and, upon application, the form
of rate regulation for the comparable services of the incumbent local exchange telephone company provided in the geographical area to be served by the applicant; and (v) promulgate standards to assure that there is no cross-subsidization
of the applicant’s competitive local exchange telephone services by any other of its services over which it has a monopoly, whether or not those services are telephone services. The Commission shall also adopt safeguards
to ensure that the prices charged and the revenue received by a county, city or town for providing telecommunications services shall not be cross-subsidized from other revenues of the county, city or town or affiliated
entities, except (i) in areas where no offers exist from for-profit providers of such telecommunications services, or (ii) as authorized pursuant to subdivision 5.

The Commission shall discharge the responsibilities of state commissions as set forth in the federal Telecommunications Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-104)(the Act) and applicable law and regulations, including, but not limited to, the arbitration of interconnection
agreements between local exchange carriers; however, the Commission may exercise its discretion to defer selected issues under the Act. If the Commission incurs additional costs in arbitrating such agreements or resolving
related legal actions or disputes that cannot be recovered through the maximum levy authorized pursuant to §

58.1-2660

, that levy shall be increased above the levy authorized by that section to the extent necessary to recover such additional costs.

Upon the Commission’s granting of a certificate to a county, city or town under this section, such county, city, or town (i) shall be subject to regulation by the Commission for intrastate telecommunications services, (ii) shall have the same duties and
obligations as other certificated providers of telecommunications services, (iii) shall separately account for the revenues, expenses, property, and source of investment dollars associated with the provision of such services,
and (iv) to ensure that there is no unreasonable advantage gained from a government agency’s taxing authority and control of government-owned land, shall charge an amount for such services that (a) does not include any
subsidies, unless approved by the Commission, and (b) takes into account, by imputation or allocation, equivalent charges for all taxes, pole rentals, rights of way, licenses, and similar costs incurred by for-profit providers.
Each certificated county, city, or town that provides telecommunications services regulated by the Commission shall file an annual report with the Commission demonstrating that the requirements of clauses (iii) and (iv)
have been met. The Commission may approve a subsidy under this section if deemed to be in the public interest and provided that such subsidy does not result in a price for the service lower than the price for the same service
charged by the incumbent provider in the area.

A locality that has obtained a certificate pursuant to this section shall (i) comply with all applicable laws and regulations for the provision of telecommunications services; (ii) make a reasonable estimate of the amount of all federal, state, and local
taxes (including income taxes and consumer utility taxes) that would be required to be paid or collected for each fiscal year if the locality were a for-profit provider of telecommunications services, (iii) prepare reasonable
estimates of the amount of any franchise fees and other state and local fees (including permit fees and pole rental fees), and right-of-way charges that would be incurred in each fiscal year if the locality were a for-profit
provider of telecommunications services, (iv) prepare and publish annually financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles showing the results of operations of its provision of telecommunications
services, and (v) maintain records demonstrating compliance with the provisions of this section that shall be made available for inspection and copying pursuant to the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.).

Each locality that has obtained a certificate pursuant to this section shall provide nondiscriminatory access to for-profit providers of telecommunications services on a first-come, first-served basis to rights-of-way, poles, conduits or other permanent
distribution facilities owned, leased or operated by the locality unless the facilities have insufficient capacity for such access and additional capacity cannot reasonably be added to the facilities.

The prices charged and the revenue received by a locality for providing telecommunications services shall not be cross-subsidized by other revenues of the locality or affiliated entities, except (i) in areas where no offers exist from for-profit providers
of such telecommunications services, or (ii) as permitted by the provisions of subdivision 5. The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to Internet access, broadband, information, and data transmission services
provided by any locality providing telecommunications services on March 1, 2002, except for an authority created pursuant to the BVU Authority Act (§

15.2-7200

et seq.).

The Commission shall promulgate rules necessary to implement this section. In no event, however, shall the rules necessary to implement clauses (iii) and (iv) of subdivision 5, clauses (ii) through (v) of subdivision 6, and subdivision 8 impose any obligations
on a locality that has obtained a certificate pursuant to this section, but is not yet providing telecommunications services regulated by the Commission.

Public records of a locality that has obtained a certificate pursuant to this section, which records contain confidential proprietary information or trade secrets pertaining to the provision of telecommunications service, shall be exempt from disclosure
under the Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.). As used in this subdivision, a public record contains confidential proprietary information or trade secrets if its acquisition by a competing provider of telecommunications services would provide
the competing provider with a competitive benefit. However, the exemption provided by this subdivision shall not apply to any authority created pursuant to the BVU Authority Act (§

15.2-7200

et seq.).

Article 5.1 (§ 56-484.7:1 et seq.) of Chapter 15 shall not apply to a county, city, or town that has obtained a certificate pursuant to this section.

Any county, city, or town that has obtained a certificate pursuant to this section may construct, own, maintain, and operate a fiber optic or communications infrastructure to provide consumers with Internet services, data transmission services, and any
other communications service that its infrastructure is capable of delivering; provided, however, nothing in this subsection shall authorize the provision of cable television services or other multi-channel video programming service.
Furthermore, nothing in this subsection shall alter the authority of the Commission.

Any county, city, or town that has obtained a certificate pursuant to this section and that had installed a cable television headend prior to December 31, 2002, is authorized to own and operate a cable television system or other multi-channel video programming
service and shall be exempt from the provisions of §§

15.2-2108.4

through

15.2-2108.8

. Nothing in this subsection shall authorize the Commission to regulate cable television service.

History.
1984, c. 382; 1995, cc. 22, 35, 187; 2001, c. 75; 2002, cc. 479, 489; 2003, cc. 677, 711, 720; 2005, c. 258; 2006, cc. 73, 76; 2009, c. 330; 2016, cc. 724, 725.

Cross references.

As to exclusions under Virginia Freedom of Information Act for proprietary records and trade secrets, see §

2.2-3705.6

. As to enterprise funds for cable television services, see §

15.2-2108.9

.

As to the BVU Authority Act, creating an Authority by entity conversion of Bristol Virginia Utilities, see Chapter 72 (§

15.2-7200

et seq.) of Title 15.2.

The 1995 amendments.

The 1995 amendments by cc. 22, 35, and 187 are identical, and added subdivisions C 1, C 2, and C 3.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 75 deleted former subsection A, concerning “granting a certificate to furnish local exchange telephone service,” and redesignated former subsections B and C as present subsections A and B; in present subsection A, deleted “however”
preceding “grant certificates” in the first sentence, deleted the former second sentence, which read: “Any company so certificated shall not be allowed to offer services within local market areas as defined by the State Corporation
Commission or in local access and transport areas as established under federal court order until January 1, 1986,” and added the last two sentences; and in the first sentence of subdivision B 1, deleted “Effective January 1, 1996”
at the beginning, substituted “all local exchange carriers certificated in the Commonwealth” for “the incumbent local exchange telephone company,” substituted “an opportunity for” for “a,” and deleted “however” preceding “grant certificates.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 479 and 489 are identical, and twice inserted “or any county, city or town that operates an electric distribution system” in subsection A; in subdivision B 1, in the first sentence substituted “any telephone company, or any
county, city or town that operates an electric distribution system” for “applicants” following “certificates to,” substituted “Commonwealth” for “service territory of another certificate holder” at the end of that sentence, and added
the last three sentences; in subdivision B 3, deleted “promulgate rules necessary to implement this subsection. These rules shall” preceding clause (i), in clause (ii), substituted “certificated” for “applicant and incumbent,” and
substituted “companies” for “company,” deleted “require that the Commission” at the beginning of clause (iv), and added the last sentence of subdivision B 3; added subdivisions B 4 and B 5 (now subdivisions B 5 and B 9); and added
subsection C.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 677 substituted “30-day” for “thirty-day” and “90 days” for “ninety days” near the end of subdivision B 2, and added subsections D and E.

The 2003 amendment by c. 711 added “Except as provided in subsection A of §

15.2-2160

” at the beginning of the fourth sentence of subdivision B 1; substituted “30-day” for “thirty-day” and “90 days” for “ninety days” near the end of subdivision B 2; added the present second sentence of subdivision B 4
(now subdivision B 5); added present subdivisions B 5 through B 7 (now subdivisions B 6 through B 8); and redesignated former subdivision B 5 as present subdivision B 8 (now subdivision B 9) and substituted “section” for “subsection”
at the end of the first sentence and added the second sentence thereof.

The 2003 amendment by c. 720 substituted “30-day” for “thirty day” and “90 days” for “ninety days” near the end of subdivision B 2; inserted present subdivision B 4; redesignated former subdivisions B 4 and B 5 as present subdivisions B 5 and B 6 (now
subdivision B 9).

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 258 added subdivision B 10.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 73 and 76 are identical, and added the last sentence in subdivision B 8.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 330 added the exception in the last sentence of subdivision B 1.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 724 and 725 are identical, effective April 8, 2016, and in subdivision B 3, deleted “of this subsection” from the end of the subdivision; in subdivision B 5, deleted “of this subdivision” following “(iv)”; in subdivision B 8,
substituted “5” for “B 5”; and added “except for an authority created pursuant to the BVU Authority Act (§

15.2-7200

et seq.)”; in subdivision B 9, substituted “clauses (iii) and (iv) of subdivision 5, clauses (ii) through (v) of subdivision 6, and subdivision 8” for “subdivisions B 5 (iii) and (iv), B ii through v, and B 8”; added
the last sentence in subdivision B 10; and in subsection C, deleted “of this title” following “Chapter 15.”

Law Review.

For article on developments in the field of Virginia public utility law from June 2002 through May 2003, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 195 (2003).

§ 56-265.4:5.
Furnishing gas service to commercial and industrial customers in an area not certificated for public utility gas service.

Any company desiring to make an exempt sale, transmission or service under subdivision (b) (4) of § 56-265.1 shall notify the Commission of its plans for furnishing such gas service. The Commission shall make a determination of whether the customers’
facilities are located within a territory for which a certificate has been granted, or, as of the time of the Commission’s receipt of the notice provided hereunder, within any area, territory, or jurisdiction served by a municipal
corporation that provided gas distribution service as of January 1, 1992, and shall prohibit the furnishing of gas service to any facility so located. The Commission shall provide notice of such plans to furnish gas service to
all public utilities providing gas service in the Commonwealth. Within sixty days of such notice, any public utility so notified may make application to the Commission to provide such service. If an application is filed, the Commission
shall determine, after a public hearing, which company shall furnish the gas service.

In the event a gas utility is issued a certificate to serve the area where customers to whom service is being provided pursuant to this section are located, the gas utility shall have the right, subject to existing contracts regarding gas service to such
customers and to the gas utility’s effective transportation tariff, to acquire any facilities installed to serve such customers, at a price to be mutually agreed upon, or if not so agreed, at a price to be determined by the Commission.

History.
1990, c. 488; 1992, c. 476.